Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-520
Limitations; not applicable to certain restricted funds.

The limitations in section 13-519 shall not apply to (1) restricted funds budgeted for capital improvements, (2) restricted funds expended from a qualified sinking fund for acquisition or replacement of tangible personal property with a useful life of five years or more, (3) restricted funds pledged to retire bonds as defined in subdivision (1) of section 10-134 and approved according to law, (4) restricted funds used by a public airport to retire interest-free loans from the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation in lieu of bonded indebtedness at a lower cost to the public airport, (5) restricted funds budgeted in support of a service which is the subject of an agreement or a modification of an existing agreement whether operated by one of the parties to the agreement or by an independent joint entity or joint public agency, (6) restricted funds budgeted to pay for repairs to infrastructure damaged by a natural disaster which is declared a disaster emergency pursuant to the Emergency Management Act, (7) restricted funds budgeted to pay for judgments, except judgments or orders from the Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a governmental unit which require or obligate a governmental unit to pay such judgment, to the extent such judgment is not paid by liability insurance coverage of a governmental unit, (8) restricted funds budgeted to pay benefits under the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act, (9) the dollar amount by which restricted funds budgeted by a natural resources district to administer and implement ground water management activities and integrated management activities under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act exceed its restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water management activities and integrated management activities for FY2003-04, or (10) restricted funds equal to the amount of local option sales and use tax budgeted to be collected within a good life district established pursuant to section 77-4405.

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 989, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 86, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 54;

Laws 1999, LB 141, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB121, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB261, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 73;

Laws 2019, LB212, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB432, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 50.

Emergency Management Act, see section 81-829.36.

Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act, see section 35-1002.

Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, see section 46-701.